Tennessee, session 114, SB2092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 10, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
(a) The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR)
shall perform a comprehensive evaluation on the preparedness and response of local
and state officials, departments, and agencies to the Hurricane Helene natural disaster.
(b) All appropriate local and state officials, departments, and agencies shall
provide assistance to TACIR in connection with the comprehensive evaluation required
by subsection (a).
(c) On or before January 31, 2027, TACIR shall report its findings regarding the
preparedness and response of local and state officials, departments, and agencies to
the Hurricane Helene natural disaster and recommendations, including any proposed
legislation, regarding lessons learned and best practices for local and state officials,
departments, and agencies in responding to future disasters to the state and local
committee of the senate and the committees of the house of representatives having
jurisdiction over local and state departments and agencies.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2092
009484
- 1 -